Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1121.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 615 of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, is amended to read:Section 615. [Right] Rights of citizen to compel compliance and intervene in proceedings.1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 [Any] (a) In addition to seeking any other remedy available at law or in equity to a citizen of this Commonwealth against the department, or a person alleged to be in violation of this act, any rule or regulation of the department or order of the department or any term or condition of any permit issued by the department, if the department fails to carry out a duty of the department under this act or any regulation, rule, order or permit issued under this act, a citizen of this Commonwealth having an interest that is or may be adversely affected has a right to commence a civil action to compel compliance with this act or any regulation, rule, order or permit issued under this act.(b) An action under subsection (a) may not be commenced if the department has commenced and is diligently prosecuting a directly related civil action in a court of the United States or the Commonwealth to require compliance with this act or any regulation, rule or order adopted or issued under this act or permit issued according to this act.(c) In any action brought under section 604 or 605, any citizen of this Commonwealth having an interest which is or may be adversely affected shall have the right on [his] the citizen's own behalf, without posting bond, to intervene in [any action brought pursuant to section 604 or 605] the action.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1121PN1367 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324